Utah statutes.
78A-6-1110.   Cooperation of political subdivisions and public or private agencies and organizations.

Every county, municipality, and school district, the Division of Child and Family Services, the Department of Health, the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, the State Board of Education, and state and local law enforcement officers, shall render all assistance and cooperation within their jurisdiction and power to further the objects of this chapter, and the juvenile courts are authorized to seek the cooperation of all agencies and organizations, public or private, whose object is the protection or aid of minors.

